Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 4

Health Equity Commission [Repealed]

3-15-401. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1039, § 1; 2008, ch. 748, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 905, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011. Acts 1990, ch. 1039, § 1; 2008, ch. 748, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 905, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-402. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1039, § 2; 2008, ch. 748, §§ 1, 3; 2010, ch. 905, § 2; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-403. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1039, § 3; 2008, ch. 748, § 1; 2010, ch. 905, § 3; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-404. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1039, § 4; 1994, ch. 932, § 1; 2008, ch. 748, §§ 1, 4; 2009, ch. 574, § 1; 2010, ch. 905, § 4; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-405. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1039, § 5; 1994, ch. 932, §§ 2, 4; 2008, ch. 748, § 5; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-406. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 576, §§ 1-3; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-407 — 3-15-425. [Reserved.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.

3-15-426. [Deleted.]

Code Commission Notes.

This section (Acts 1994, ch. 932, § 3) concerning the corporate practice review board, has been deleted from the code. The function of the board was to arbitrate claims brought under 1994 Senate Bill 2084/House Bill No. 2354; however, that bill was not passed, and this section is deemed to be without effect.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§3-15-401 —3-15-426 concerned the health equity commission.